Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.150

Liability of surety, limitation.

The liability of the surety is limited to the amount of the bond when acting within the scope of the surety's duties in issuing the bond.

[ 1986 c 322 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 322: See note following RCW 10.19.090.